Hawaii statutes.
§321-28 Traumatic brain injury advisory
board. There is established within the department of health the traumatic
brain injury advisory board. The advisory board, in consultation with the
neurotrauma advisory board, shall advise the department in the development and
implementation of a comprehensive plan to address the needs of persons affected
by disorders and disabilities that involve the brain. Further, the advisory
board, in consultation with the neurotrauma advisory board, shall advise the
department of the feasibility of establishing agreements with private sector
agencies to develop services for persons with brain injuries.

The advisory board shall consist of at least
nine members who shall be appointed by the director of health in accordance with
section 26-35. The director of health shall designate a member to be the
chairperson of the advisory board. The director of health or a designee shall
serve as an ex officio nonvoting member of the advisory board. The members
shall serve for a term of four years; provided that upon the initial
appointment of the members, two shall be appointed for a term of one year, two
for a term of two years, two for a term of three years, and three for a term of
four years. In establishing the advisory board, the director of health shall
appoint at least:

(1) Two members representing private sector
businesses that provide services for brain injured persons;

(2) Two survivors of traumatic brain injury; and

(3) One member representing trauma centers that
provide services for brain injured persons.

The members shall serve without compensation
but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses, including travel expenses, that
are necessary for the performance of their duties. [L 1997, c 333, §2; am L
2002, c 160, §12]

Note

Concussion educational program under department of
education. L 2012, c 197; L 2016, c 262.

Cross References

Neurotrauma advisory board, see §321H-3.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next